North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-02 Agricultural Fair Associations [Repealed]

4-02-01.
Power to make regulations governing premises. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 7, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 4604; C.L. 1913, § 5111; R.C. 1943, § 4-0201; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-02.
Director’s liability limited. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 128, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 4-0202; S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 27; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-03.
Debts — Limitation of amount. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 14.

4-02-04.
Income and expenses — Membership in association and terms thereof. [Repealed]

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 565; S.L. 1879, ch. 8, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 3202; R.C. 1899, § 3202; R.C. 1905, § 4609; S.L. 1907, ch. 126, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 5116; R.C. 1943, § 4-0204; S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 29; 1985, ch. 89, § 2; 1995, ch. 61, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-05.
Real property — District associations — Limitations on holding. [Repealed]

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 562; R.C. 1895, § 3200; R.C. 1899, § 3200; R.C. 1905, § 4607; C.L. 1913, § 5114; R.C. 1943, § 4-0205; S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 30; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-06.
Exhibition dates to be filed — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 60, § 2.

4-02-07.
Treasurer to give bond — Duty of directors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 163, §§ 1, 2; C.L. 1913, §§ 1854, 1855, 1872, 1873; R.C. 1943, § 4-0207; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-08.
Organization under corporation laws. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1879, ch. 8, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 3202; R.C. 1899, § 3202; R.C. 1905, § 4609; S.L. 1907, ch. 126, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 5116; R.C. 1943, § 4-0208; S.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-09.
Fairs — Location at Grand Forks and Fargo. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 14.

4-02-10.
Purpose of fair associations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 46, §§ 2, 3; R.C. 1905, §§ 1300, 1301; S.L. 1911, ch. 43, § 2; C.L. 1913, §§ 1848, 1849, 1861; S.L. 1923, ch. 217, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 1866a2; R.C. 1943, § 4-0210; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-11.
Premises — Custody and control. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 14.

4-02-12.
Nonliability of state for debts — Exception. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 46, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 1304; S.L. 1911, ch. 43, § 4; C.L. 1913, §§ 1852, 1863; S.L. 1923, ch. 217, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 1866a4; S.L. 1935, ch. 5, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 4-0212; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-13.
Board of directors — State associations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 332, § 26.

4-02-14.
Executive committee appointed by directors — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 332, § 26.

4-02-15.
Association may lease property. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 14.

4-02-16.
Failure of association to comply with chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 38.

4-02-17.
District fair — Location. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 92, § 3.

4-02-18.
Premises of district fair — Custody and control. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 92, § 3.

4-02-19.
Minot district fair — Title to land. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 92, § 3.

Note.

Section 1 of chapter 92, S.L. 1979, provides:

“The title to any real property owned by the Minot district fair is hereby transferred to the state fair association”.

4-02-20.
Board of directors of Minot fair. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 92, § 3.

4-02-21.
Board of directors of Mandan fair. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 86, § 3.

4-02-22.
Executive committee appointed by directors — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 92, § 3.

4-02-23.
Townships, municipalities may contribute to district fair associations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 92, § 3.

4-02-24.
Disposition of money contributed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 92, § 3.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 92, S.L. 1979, provides:

“Any funds belonging to the Minot district fair are hereby transferred to the state fair operating fund of the state treasury”.

4-02-25.
Report of prize list to be given. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 92, § 3.

4-02-26.
County fairs — Association — County funding. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 66; R.C. 1899, § 163; S.L. 1905, ch. 70, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 1310; C.L. 1913, § 1867; S.L. 1915, ch. 109, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1867; R.C. 1943, § 4-0226; S.L. 1983, ch. 593, § 2; 1983, ch. 606, § 2; 1987, ch. 676, § 1; 1995, ch. 61, § 3; 2015, ch. 439, § 4, effective January 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-26.1.
County fair authorization — Forfeiture. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 48, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-27.
Reports required of county fair associations — Tax levies for support thereof. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 70, § 2; R.C. 1905, § 1311; C.L. 1913, § 1868; 1925 Supp., § 1868; R.C. 1943, § 4-0227; S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 3; 1987, ch. 676, § 2; 1995, ch. 61, § 4; 2015, ch. 88, § 4, effective January 1, 2016.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

4-02-27.1.
Additional levy authorized. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 90, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-02271; S.L. 1963, ch. 78, § 1; 1983, ch. 606, § 4; 1987, ch. 676, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

4-02-27.2.
Additional levy in certain counties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 79, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 3; 1983, ch. 606, § 5; 1985, ch. 235, § 2; 1995, ch. 61, § 5; 1997, ch. 108, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

4-02-27.3.
Disposition of property. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 79, § 2; 1995, ch. 61, § 6; 2011, ch. 60, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 5, effective January 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-28.
Associations entitled to aid. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 70, § 4; R.C. 1905, § 1313; C.L. 1913, § 1870; R.C. 1943, § 4-0228; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-29.
Levy of taxes to cease when fair not held — Misappropriation of funds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 70, § 5; R.C. 1905, § 1314; C.L. 1913, § 18701; R.C. 1943, § 4-0229; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-30.
Tax to be submitted to vote. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 70, § 6; R.C. 1905, § 1315; C.L. 1913, § 1874; R.C. 1943, § 4-0230; S.L. 1947, ch. 2, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 4-0230; S.L. 1961, ch. 99, § 1; 1985, ch. 235, § 3; 1991, ch. 58, § 1; 1995, ch. 61, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-31.
Purchase or lease of land — Election required. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 102, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1874a1; R.C. 1943, § 4-0231; S.L. 1985, ch. 235, § 4; 1997, ch. 108, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-32.
Expenses of leasing and purchasing — How paid. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 14.

4-02-33.
Board of county commissioners to make rules and regulations governing county fair. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 14.

4-02-34.
Moneys received and expended — Regulations governing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 14.

4-02-35.
County fair fund — Transfer to county general fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 107, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-36.
Chapter not applicable to state fair association. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 73, § 37; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-02-37.
Multicounty fairs — Association — Tax levy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 72, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 4; 1983, ch. 606, § 7; 1987, ch. 676, § 4; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.